Mississippi statutes. Title 45. Public Safety and Good Order
Use of Safety Glazing Material in Hazardous Locations

§ 45-11-81.
Definitions.

The following terms shall have the meaning ascribed to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

“Safety glazing material” shall mean any glazing material such as tempered glass, laminated glass, wire glass or rigid plastic, which meets the test requirements of ANSI standard Z-97.1-1972.

“Hazardous locations” shall mean those installations, glazed or to be glazed, in commercial and public buildings, known as framed or unframed glass entrance doors, and those fixed glazed panels immediately adjacent to entrance or exit doors and which may be mistaken for doors, and those installations, glazed or to be glazed, in residential buildings and other structures used as dwellings, commercial buildings and public buildings, known as sliding glass doors, storm doors, shower doors and bathtub enclosures. Any entrance or exit door, or fixed glazed panel immediately adjacent to entrance or exit doors which may be mistaken for doors, which is fifty percent (50%) or more exposed glass without division frames, or contains a single glass panel with glass of more than sixty (60) inches in height or twenty-four (24) inches in width, will be a hazardous location.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 571, § 1, eff from and after Jan 1, 1975.

§ 45-11-83.
Labeling required.

Each light of safety glazing material manufactured, distributed, imported or sold for use in hazardous locations or installed in such a location within the State of Mississippi shall be permanently labeled by such means as etching, sandblasting, firing of ceramic material on the safety glazing material, or by other suitable means. The label shall identify the labeler, whether manufacturer, fabricator or installer, and the nominal thickness and the type of safety glazing material and the fact that said material meets the test requirements of ANSI standard Z-97.1-1972. The label must be legible and visible after installation.

Such safety glazing labeling shall not be used on other than safety glazing materials.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 571, § 2, eff from and after January 1, 1975.

§ 45-11-85.
Offenses; construction of section.

It shall be unlawful within the State of Mississippi to knowingly sell, fabricate, assemble, glaze, or install glazing materials other than safety glazing materials in, or for use in, any hazardous location, whether in a new installation or replacement in an existing location, as defined hereinabove after January 1, 1975. This section shall not be construed as being retroactive.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 571, § 3, eff from and after Jan 1, 1975.

§ 45-11-87.
Workmen not liable.

No liability under Sections 45-11-81 through 45-11-89 shall be created as to workmen who are employees of a contractor, subcontractor, or other employer responsible for compliance with Sections 45-11-81 through 45-11-89.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 571, § 4, eff from and after Jan 1, 1975.

§ 45-11-89.
Penalties.

Whoever violates the provisions of Sections 45-11-81 through 45-11-89 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to pay a fine of not less than Fifty Dollars ($50.00) nor more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), or to imprisonment of not more than six (6) months, or both.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 571, § 5, eff from and after January 1, 1975.